Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.231 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Child" means a person who is five (5) years of age or less;
2. "Childcare and education provider" means a person who owns
or operates an eligible program;
3. "Childcare expense" means the cost of locating safe and
dependable services for the care of a minor child of an employee;
4. "Eligible program" means an applicable childcare and early
childhood education program that has applied to participate in the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1848 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

qual ity rating and improvement system and has been assigned a
quality scale rating;
5. "Eligible staff member" means a person who is employed with,
or who is a self-employed person providing childcare and early
childhood education for, an eligible program for at least six (6)
months of the taxable year. Eligible staff member does not include
certificated teaching and administrative staff employed by programs
established pursuant to applicable provisions of law;
6. "Employee" means a person to whom wages or other
compensation is paid by an employer;
7. "Employer" means any sole proprietor or lawfully recognized
business entity engaged in lawful business activity;
8. "Licensed childcare facility" means a person or entity
lawfully authorized to provide childcare services within the state
and which is enrolled in Oklahoma's Quality Rating and Improvement
System (QRIS);
9. "Qualified childcare worker" means a person employed for at
least eight (8) consecutive months during the calendar year
corresponding to the income tax year for which the credit authorized
by this section is claimed and who performs classroom services for a
licensed childcare facility and who is enrolled in Oklahoma's
Professional Development Ladder (PDL); and
10. "Quality scale rating" means the rating of an eligible
program under which the rating is expressed in terms of stars.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1848 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and
ending not later than December 31, 2030, subject to the limitations
prescribed by this subsection and subsection D of this section,
there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant
to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, an amount
equal to:
1. Thirty percent (30%) of the amount expended by an employer
for assistance provided by the employer to an employee for the
employee's direct expenses of childcare;
2. Thirty percent (30%) of the amount expended by an employer
for the cost of operating or contracting to operate a childcare
facility primarily used by dependents of the employees of such
employer or group of employees in the area, excluding any payments
made by the parent or guardian of such dependent such as tuition or
fees; or
3. Thirty percent (30%) of the amount expended by an employer
to contract with a childcare facility to reserving spots for its
employees.
C. The total credit amount which may be claimed by an employer
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not exceed Thirty
Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) for credits claimed pursuant to
subsection B of this section for any taxable year.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1848 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. The credits authorized pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall not be used to reduce the income tax liability of the
taxpayer to less than zero (0).
E. To the extent not used the credits authorized by this
section may be carried over, in order, to each of the succeeding
five (5) tax years.
F. The total amount of credits authorized to be used to reduce
income tax liabilities pursuant to the provisions of this section
shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) each fiscal
year.
G. The provisions of this section shall cease to have the force
and effect of law on January 1, 2031.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 23, 2025 - DO PASS










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1848 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)